el: Μέσα ενημέρωσης > Περιοδικά & εφημερίδες > Περιοδικά: Περιοδικά καταναλωτών; Περιοδικά για εσωτερική χρήση; Επαγγελματικά περιοδικά
sl-SI: Mediji > Revije in časopisi > Revije: Potrošniške revije; Interne revije; Strokovne revije
lt-LT: Medija > Žurnalai ir laikraščiai > Žurnalai: Vartotojų žurnalai; Vidiniai organizacijų žurnalai; Profesiniai žurnalai
fr: Médias > Magazines et journaux > Magazines: Magazines grand public; Magazines internes; Revues professionnelles
th: สื่อ > นิตยสารและหนังสือพิมพ์ > นิตยสาร: นิตยสารทั่วไป; นิตยสารภายในองค์กร; นิตยสารวิชาชีพ
en: Media > Magazines & Newspapers > Magazines: Consumer Magazines; In-House Magazines; Professional Magazines
cs: Média > Noviny a časopisy > Časopisy: Spotřebitelské časopisy; Interní časopisy; Odborné časopisy
zh-CN: 媒体 > 报纸/杂志 > 杂志: 消费者杂志; 内部杂志; 专业杂志
ro-RO: Media > Reviste și ziare > Reviste: Reviste pentru consumatori; Reviste interne; Reviste profesionale
vi: Truyền thông > Tạp chí và báo > Tạp chí: Tạp chí tiêu dùng; Tạp chí nội bộ; Tạp chí ngành nghề
es: Multimedia > Revistas y periódicos > Revistas: Revistas para consumidores; Revistas internas; Revistas profesionales
hu: Média > Magazinok és újságok > Magazinok: Fogyasztói magazinok; Házon belüli magazinok; Szakmai magazinok
da: Medier > Magasiner og aviser > Magasiner: Forbrugermagasiner; In-house-magasiner; Professionelle magasiner
ja: メディア > 新聞・雑誌 > 雑誌: 消費者雑誌; 社内報; 専門雑誌
nb: Medier > Magasiner og aviser > Magasiner: Forbrukermagasiner; Interne magasiner; Profesjonelle magasiner
sk-SK: Médiá > Časopisy a noviny > Časopisy: Spotrebiteľské časopisy; Interné časopisy; Odborné časopisy
fi: Media > Aikakaus- ja sanomalehdet > Aikakauslehdet: Kuluttajalehdet; Talon sisäiset lehdet; Ammatilliset lehdet
hr-HR: Mediji > Časopisi i novine > Časopisi: Časopisi za potrošače; Interni časopisi; Stručni časopisi
ko: 미디어 > 잡지/신문 > 잡지: 소비자 잡지; 사내 잡지; 전문 잡지
nl: Media > Tijdschriften en kranten > Tijdschriften: Consumententijdschriften; Interne tijdschriften; Professionele tijdschriften
de: Medien > Zeitschriften & Zeitungen > Zeitschriften: Verbraucherzeitschriften; Hausinterne Zeitschriften; Professionelle Zeitschriften
ru: Медиаконтент > Журналы и газеты > Журналы: Потребительские журналы; Корпоративные журналы; Профессиональные журналы
pt-BR: Mídia > Revistas e jornais > Revistas: Revistas de consumo; Revistas internas; Revistas profissionais
zh-TW: 媒體 > 雜誌/報紙 > 雜誌: 消費者雜誌; 內部雜誌; 專業雜誌
bg-BG: Медия > Списания и вестници > Списания: Списания за потребители; Издавани от организации списания за служителите им; Професионални списания
pt-PT: Multimédia > Revistas e jornais > Revistas: Revistas de consumo; Revistas internas; Revistas profissionais
it: Media > Riviste e giornali > Riviste: Riviste consumatori; Riviste interne; Riviste professionali
sv: Media > Tidningar och tidskrifter > Tidskrifter: Konsumenttidningar; Interna tidningar; Professionella tidningar
pl: Media > Gazety i czasopisma > Czasopisma: Czasopisma konsumenckie; Magazyny wnętrzarskie; Czasopisma branżowe
tr: Medya > Dergiler ve Gazeteler > Dergiler: Tüketici Dergileri; Şirket İçi Dergiler; Profesyonel Dergiler